Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1207
Person, defined.

Person shall mean an individual, partnership, limited liability company, firm, corporation, association, or other entity.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 204.